dev/apertium-mar.mar.dix
    <pardef n="पाण/ी__n">
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यात</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यातून</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्याला</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्याला</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l></l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांत</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांतून</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांना</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांना</l><r>ी<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="डोळ/ा__n_m"> 
      <e><p><l></l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यात</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यातून</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्याला</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्याला</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यापुढे</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्याबरोबर</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/>बरोबर<s n="post"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यासमोरच्या</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/>समोर<s n="post"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यासमोर</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l></l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांत</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांतून</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांना</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांना</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांपुढे</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांबरोबर</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/>बरोबर<s n="post"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांसमोरच्या</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><j/>समोर<s n="post"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्यांसमोर</l><r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="सोबत__n_mfn"> 
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>चा</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>चे</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="दशा__n"> 
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>त</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>तून</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>चा</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ची</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ला</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ंत</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ंतून</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ंचा</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ंची</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ंना</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
   
    <pardef n="माहित__n"> 
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>गारी</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><j/>गारी<s n="post"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="स्वत/ः__n"> 
      <e><p><l></l><r>ः<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ात</l><r>ः<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ातून</l><r>ः<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ाला</l><r>ः<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ाला</l><r>ः<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l></l><r>ः<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांत</l><r>ः<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांतून</l><r>ः<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांना</l><r>ः<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ांना</l><r>ः<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>



    <!-- SECTION: Proper nouns -->

    <pardef n="राम__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ला</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ने</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ला</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>कडे</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>पाशी</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>पासुन</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>च</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>चा</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>चे</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>चं</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>



    <pardef n="काजल__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ला</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ने</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ला</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>कडे</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>पाशी</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>पासुन</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>च</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>चा</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>चे</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>चं</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>  
    </pardef>
     
     
    <pardef n="स्व्यंपाक__np">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>च</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>चं</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>  
            
    <!-- SECTION: Adjectives -->
  
    <pardef n="मोठ/ा__adj">
      <e><p><l>ा</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ी</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>े</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>्या</l><r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>    

    <e lm="घंटा"><i>घंटा</i><par n="स्व्यंपाक__np"/></e>
    <e lm="चेहरा"><i>चेहरा</i><par n="राम__np"/></e>
    <e lm="डोळा"><i>डोळ</i><par n="डोळ/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ताक"><i>ताक</i><par n="राम__np"/></e>
    <e lm="तास"><i>तास</i><par n="स्व्यंपाक__np"/></e>
    <e lm="दशा"><i>दशा</i><par n="दशा__n"/></e>
    <e lm="दात"><i>दात</i><par n="डोळ/ा__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="नाक"><i>नाक</i><par n="राम__np"/></e>
    <e lm="पाणी"><i>पाण</i><par n="पाण/ी__n"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रेम"><i>प्रेम</i><par n="सोबत__n_mfn"/></e>
    <e lm="बाई"><i>बाई</i><par n="काजल__np"/></e>
    <e lm="माहित"><i>माहित</i><par n="माहित__n"/></e>
    <e lm="रोटी"><i>रोट</i><par n="पाण/ी__n"/></e>
    <e lm="विश्वास"><i>विश्वास</i><par n="सोबत__n_mfn"/></e>
    <e lm="स्वतः"><i>स्वत</i><par n="स्वत/ः__n"/></e>
    <e lm="सोबत"><i>सोबत</i><par n="सोबत__n_mfn"/></e>
    <e lm="आश्रू"><i>आश्रू</i><par n="स्व्यंपाक__np"/></e>
    <e lm="कप"><i>कप</i><par n="राम__np"/></e>
    <e lm="काजल"><i>काजल</i><par n="काजल__np"/></e>
    <e lm="गिरजा"><i>गिरजा</i><par n="राम__np"/></e>
    <e lm="गर्जना"><i>गर्जना</i><par n="स्व्यंपाक__np"/></e>
    <e lm="चाह"><i>चाह</i><par n="काजल__np"/></e>
    <e lm="चेटकीण"><i>चेटकीण</i><par n="काजल__np"/></e>
    <e lm="जेम्स"><i>जेम्स</i><par n="राम__np"/></e>
    <e lm="तमाशा"><i>तमाशा</i><par n="स्व्यंपाक__np"/></e>
    <e lm="दहाड"><i>दहाड</i><par n="स्व्यंपाक__np"/></e>
    <e lm="नूरेंद्र"><i>नूरेंद्र</i><par n="राम__np"/></e>
    <e lm="मेरी"><i>मेरी</i><par n="काजल__np"/></e>
    <e lm="राम"><i>राम</i><par n="राम__np"/></e>
    <e lm="राहुल"><i>राहुल</i><par n="राम__np"/></e>
    <e lm="सुमित्रा"><i>सुमित्रा</i><par n="काजल__np"/></e>
    <e lm="सूट"><i>सूट</i><par n="राम__np"/></e>
    <e lm="स्व्यंपाक"><i>स्व्यंपाक</i><par n="स्व्यंपाक__np"/></e>
    <e lm="काळा"><i>काळ</i><par n="मोठ/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="खरा"><i>खर</i><par n="मोठ/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="खोटा"><i>खोट</i><par n="मोठ/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="चांगला"><i>चांगल</i><par n="मोठ/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="छोटा"><i>छोट</i><par n="मोठ/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="जुना"><i>जुन</i><par n="मोठ/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="थोडा"><i>थोड</i><par n="मोठ/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="दु:खा"><i>दु:ख</i><par n="मोठ/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="परका"><i>परक</i><par n="मोठ/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पांढरा"><i>पांढर</i><par n="मोठ/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मोठा"><i>मोठ</i><par n="मोठ/ा__adj"/></e>
